Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 1 General Provisions

Editor’s notes.

The existing provisions of Chapter 2A
were designated as Article 1 of Chapter 2A by Ga. L. 2016, p. 214, § 1/SB 308, effective July 1, 2016.

Law reviews.

For note, “Who Calls the Shots?: Parents Versus the Parens Patriae Power of the States to Mandate Vaccines for Children in New York,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 637 (2021).

31-2A-1.
Creation of Board of Public Health; powers, duties, and functions of Board of Community Health transferred to the Board of Public Health; board composition and terms; vacancies, removal; chairperson; reimbursement of expenses.

There is created the Board of Public Health which shall establish the general policy to be followed by the Department of Public Health. The powers, functions, and duties of the Board of Community Health as they existed on June 30, 2011, with regard to the Division of Public Health and the Office of Health Improvement, unless otherwise provided in this Act, are transferred to the Board of Public Health effective July 1, 2011. The board shall consist of nine members appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate.

The Governor shall designate the initial terms of the members of the board as follows: three members shall be appointed for one year; three members shall be appointed for two years; and three members shall be appointed for three years. Thereafter, all succeeding appointments shall be for three-year terms from the expiration of the previous term.

Vacancies in office shall be filled by appointment by the Governor in the same manner as the appointment to the position on the board which becomes vacant. An appointment to fill a vacancy other than by expiration of a term of office shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.

Members of the board may be removed from office under the same conditions for removal from office of members of professional licensing boards provided in Code Section 43-1-17.

There shall be a chairperson of the board elected by and from the membership of the board who shall be the presiding officer of the board.

The members of the board shall receive the same daily expense allowance and reimbursement of expenses as provided in Code Section 45-7-21 for members of other state boards.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-1/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article, “Health: Department of Public Health,” see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-2A-2.
Creation of Department of Public Health; transition of powers, function, and duties to new agency; commissioner of public health; creation of divisions.

There is created a Department of Public Health. The powers, functions, and duties of the Division of Public Health and the Office of Health Improvement of the Department of Community Health as they existed on June 30, 2011, unless otherwise provided in this Act, are transferred to the Department of Public Health effective July 1, 2011.

There is created the position of commissioner of public health. The commissioner shall be the chief administrative officer of the department and be both appointed and removed by the Governor. Subject to the general policy established by the board, the commissioner shall supervise, direct, account for, organize, plan, administer, and execute the functions vested in the department.

There shall be created in the department such divisions as may be found necessary for its effective operation. The commissioner shall have the power to allocate and reallocate functions among the divisions within the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-1/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article, “Health: Department of Public Health,” see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-2A-3.
Department of Public Health successor to certain rules, regulations, policies, procedures, administrative orders, rights, interests, and obligations of Department of Community Health.

The Department of Public Health shall succeed to all rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders of the Department of Community Health that are in effect on June 30, 2011, or scheduled to go into effect on or after July 1, 2011, and which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Public Health pursuant to Code Section 31-2A-2 and shall further succeed to any rights, privileges, entitlements, obligations, and duties of the Department of Community Health that are in effect on June 30, 2011, which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Public Health pursuant to Code Section 31-2A-2. Such rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders shall remain in effect until amended, repealed, superseded, or nullified by the Department of Public Health by proper authority or as otherwise provided by law.

The rights, privileges, entitlements, and duties of parties to contracts, leases, agreements, and other transactions as identified by the Office of Planning and Budget entered into before July 1, 2011, by the Department of Community Health which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Public Health pursuant to Code Section 31-2A-2 shall continue to exist; and none of these rights, privileges, entitlements, and duties are impaired or diminished by reason of the transfer of the functions to the Department of Public Health. In all such instances, the Department of Public Health shall be substituted for the Department of Community Health, and the Department of Public Health shall succeed to the rights and duties under such contracts, leases, agreements, and other transactions.

All persons employed by the Department of Community Health in capacities which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Public Health pursuant to Code Section 31-2A-2 on June 30, 2011, shall, on July 1, 2011, become employees of the Department of Public Health in similar capacities, as determined by the commissioner of public health. Such employees shall be subject to the employment practices and policies of the Department of Public Health on and after July 1, 2011, but the compensation and benefits of such transferred employees shall not be reduced as a result of such transfer. Employees who are subject to the rules of the State Personnel Board and who are transferred to the department shall retain all existing rights under such rules. Accrued annual and sick leave possessed by the transferred employees on June 30, 2011, shall be retained by such employees as employees of the Department of Public Health.

On July 1, 2011, the Department of Public Health shall receive custody of the state owned real property in the custody of the Department of Community Health on June 30, 2011, and which pertains to the functions transferred to the Department of Public Health pursuant to Code Section 31-2A-2.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-1/HB 214; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-34/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

31-2A-4.
Obligation to safeguard and promote health of people of the state.

The Department of Public Health shall safeguard and promote the health of the people of this state and is empowered to employ all legal means appropriate to that end. Illustrating, without limiting, the foregoing grant of authority, the department is empowered to:

Provide epidemiological investigations and laboratory facilities and services in the detection and control of disease, disorders, and disabilities and to provide research, conduct investigations, and disseminate information concerning reduction in the incidence and proper control of disease, disorders, and disabilities;

Forestall and correct physical, chemical, and biological conditions that, if left to run their course, could be injurious to health;

Regulate and require the use of sanitary facilities at construction sites and places of public assembly and to regulate persons, firms, and corporations engaged in the rental and service of portable chemical toilets;

Isolate and treat persons afflicted with a communicable disease who are either unable or unwilling to observe the department’s rules and regulations for the suppression of such disease and to establish, to that end, complete or modified quarantine, surveillance, or isolation of persons and animals exposed to a disease communicable to man;

Procure and distribute drugs and biologicals and purchase services from clinics, laboratories, hospitals, and other health facilities and, when authorized by law, to acquire and operate such facilities;

Cooperate with agencies and departments of the federal government and of the state by supplying consultant services in medical and hospital programs and in the health aspects of civil defense, emergency preparedness, and emergency response;

Prevent, detect, and relieve physical defects and deformities;

Promote the prevention, early detection, and control of problems affecting the dental and oral health of the citizens of Georgia;

Contract with county boards of health to assist in the performance of services incumbent upon them under Chapter 3 of this title and, in the event of grave emergencies of more than local peril, to employ whatever means may be at its disposal to overcome such emergencies;

Contract and execute releases for assistance in the performance of its functions and the exercise of its powers and to supply services which are within its purview to perform;

Enter into or upon public or private property at reasonable times for the purpose of inspecting same to determine the presence of disease and conditions deleterious to health or to determine compliance with health laws and rules, regulations, and standards thereunder;

Establish, by rule adopted pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” a schedule of fees for laboratory services provided, schedules to be determined in a manner so as to help defray the costs incurred by the department, but in no event to exceed such costs, both direct and indirect, in providing such laboratory services, provided no person shall be denied services on the basis of his or her inability to pay. All fees paid thereunder shall be paid into the general funds of the State of Georgia. The individual who requests the services authorized in this paragraph, or the individual for whom the laboratory services authorized in this paragraph are performed, shall be responsible for payment of the service fees. As used in this paragraph, the term “individual” means a natural person or his or her responsible health benefit policy or Title XVIII, XIX, or XXI of the federal Social Security Act of 1935;

Exchange data with the Department of Community Health for purposes of health improvement and fraud prevention for programs operated by the Department of Community Health pursuant to mutually agreed upon data sharing agreements and in accordance with federal confidentiality laws relating to health care;

Provide The Council of Superior Court Clerks of Georgia the data set forth in Code Section 15-12-40.1, without charge and in the electronic format requested; and

Maintain and administer the electronic prescription drug monitoring program data base established under Code Section 16-13-57.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-1/HB 214; Ga. L. 2014, p. 451, § 10/HB 776; Ga. L. 2017, p. 319, § 1-5/HB 249.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (13), substituted “; and” for the period at the end of paragraph (14), and added paragraph (15).

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Orders 04.20.20.01, 05.12.20.02, 05.28.20.02, 06.11.20.01, 07.31.20.02, 08.15.20.01, 08.31.20.02, 09.15.20.01, 09.30.20.02, 10.15.20.01, 10.30.20.02, 11.13.20.01, 11.20.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.02, 01.07.21.02, 01.15.21.01, 01.22.21.07, 01.29.21.02, 02.15.21.01, 02.26.21.02, 03.12.21.01, 03.31.21.03, 04.30.21.01, and 05.28.21.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

Law reviews.

For note, “Don’t Let the Bed Bugs Bill: Landlord Liability for Bed Bug Infestations,” see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 479 (2018).

For article, “Mandatory Quarantine:
Administrative Order by the Georgia Department of Public Health for Public Health Control Measures:
Isolation Protocol,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2020).

31-2A-5.
Office of Women’s Health; duties.

There is created in the department the Office of Women’s Health.

The Office of Women’s Health shall serve in an advisory capacity to the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination. In particular, the office shall:

Raise awareness of women’s nonreproductive health issues;

Raise awareness of women’s reproductive health issues;

Inform and engage in prevention and education activities relating to women’s nonreproductive health issues; and

Serve as a clearing-house for women’s health information for purposes of planning and coordination.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-1/HB 214; Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-5/HB 186; Ga. L. 2020, p. 55, § 4/SB 372.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “Office of Health Strategy and Coordination” for “Governor, the General Assembly, the board, the department, and all other state agencies in matters relating to women’s health” in the first sentence of subsection (b); and added subsection (d).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, deleted the second through seventh sentences in subsection (a); added paragraph (b)(2); redesignated former paragraphs (b)(2) and (b)(3) as present paragraphs (b)(3) and (4), respectively; deleted former paragraphs (b)(4) and (b)(5); and deleted former subsections (c) and (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-1/HB 186, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This part shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Health Act.’ ”

31-2A-6.
Rules and regulations.

The department is authorized to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to effect prevention, abatement, and correction of situations and conditions which, if not promptly checked, would militate against the health of the people of this state. Such rules and regulations shall be adapted to the purposes intended, within the purview of the powers and duties imposed upon the department by this chapter, and supersede conflicting rules, regulations, and orders adopted pursuant to the authority of Chapter 3 of this title.

The department upon application or petition may grant variances and waivers to specific rules and regulations which establish standards for facilities or entities regulated by the department as follows:

The department may authorize departure from the literal requirements of a rule or regulation by granting a variance upon a showing by the applicant or petitioner that the particular rule or regulation that is the subject of the variance request should not be applied as written because strict application would cause undue hardship. The applicant or petitioner additionally must show that adequate standards affording protection of health, safety, and care exist and will be met in lieu of the exact requirements of the rule or regulation in question;

The department may dispense entirely with the enforcement of a rule or regulation by granting a waiver upon a showing by the applicant or petitioner that the purpose of the rule or regulation is met through equivalent standards affording equivalent protection of health, safety, and care;

The department may grant waivers and variances to allow experimentation and demonstration of new and innovative approaches to delivery of services upon a showing by the applicant or petitioner that the intended protections afforded by the rule or regulation which is the subject of the request are met and that the innovative approach has the potential to improve service delivery;

Waivers or variances which affect an entire class of facilities may only be approved by the Board of Public Health and shall be for a time certain, as determined by the board. A notice of the proposed variance or waiver affecting an entire class of facilities shall be made in accordance with the requirements for notice of rule making in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act”; or

Variances or waivers which affect only one facility in a class may be approved or denied by the department and shall be for a time certain, as determined by the department. The department shall maintain a record of such action and shall make this information available to the board and all other persons who request it.

The department may exempt classes of facilities from regulation when, in the department’s judgment, regulation would not permit the purpose intended or the class of facilities is subject to similar requirements under other rules and regulations. Such exemptions shall be provided in rules and regulations promulgated by the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-1/HB 214.

31-2A-7.
“Conviction data” defined; department authorized to receive data from law enforcement relevant to employment decisions; criminal history information; retention of fingerprints.

As used in this Code section, the term “conviction data” means a record of a finding or verdict of guilty or a plea of guilty or a plea of nolo contendere with regard to any crime, regardless of whether an appeal of the conviction has been sought.

The department may receive from any law enforcement agency conviction data that is relevant to a person whom the department, its contractors, or a district or county health agency is considering as a final selectee for employment in a position the duties of which involve direct care, treatment, custodial responsibilities, or any combination thereof for its clients. The department may also receive conviction data which is relevant to a person whom the department, its contractors, or a district or county health agency is considering as a final selectee for employment in a position if, in the judgment of the department, a final employment decision regarding the selectee can only be made by a review of conviction data in relation to the particular duties of the position and the security and safety of clients, the general public, or other employees.

The department shall establish a uniform method of obtaining conviction data under subsection (b) of this Code section which shall be applicable to the department and its contractors. Such uniform method shall require the submission to the Georgia Crime Information Center of fingerprints and the records search fee in accordance with Code Section 35-3-35. Upon receipt thereof, the Georgia Crime Information Center shall promptly transmit fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a search of bureau records and an appropriate report and shall promptly conduct a search of its own records and records to which it has access. After receiving the fingerprints and fee, the Georgia Crime Information Center shall notify the department in writing of any derogatory finding, including, but not limited to, any conviction data regarding the fingerprint records check or if there is no such finding.

All conviction data received shall be for the exclusive purpose of making employment decisions or decisions concerning individuals in the care of the department and shall be privileged and shall not be released or otherwise disclosed to any other person or agency. Immediately following the employment decisions or upon receipt of the conviction data, all such conviction data collected by the department or its agent shall be maintained by the department or agent pursuant to laws regarding and the rules or regulations of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Georgia Crime Information Center, as is applicable. Penalties for the unauthorized release or disclosure of any conviction data shall be as prescribed pursuant to laws regarding and rules or regulations of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Georgia Crime Information Center, as is applicable. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to allow criminal history information, including arrest and conviction data, to be released or disclosed to any individual, including members of county boards of health, who is not directly involved in the hiring process.

The department may promulgate written rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this Code section.

The department may receive from any law enforcement agency criminal history information, including arrest and conviction data, and any and all other information which it may be provided pursuant to state or federal law which is relevant to any person in the care of the department. The department shall establish a uniform method of obtaining criminal history information under this subsection. Such method shall require the submission to the Georgia Crime Information Center of fingerprints together with any required records search fee in accordance with Code Section 35-3-35. Upon receipt thereof, the Georgia Crime Information Center shall promptly transmit the fingerprints submitted by the department to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a search of bureau records and an appropriate report and shall promptly conduct a search of its own records and records to which it has access. Such method shall also permit the submission of the names alone of such persons to the proper law enforcement agency for a name based check of such person’s criminal history information as maintained by the Georgia Crime Information Center and the Federal Bureau of Investigation. In such circumstances, the department shall submit fingerprints of those persons together with any required records search fee to the Federal Bureau of Investigation within 15 calendar days of the date of the name based check on that person. The fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation through the Georgia Crime Information Center in accordance with Code Section 35-3-35. Following the submission of such fingerprints, the department may receive the criminal history information, including arrest and conviction data, relevant to such person.

The department shall be authorized to conduct a name or descriptor based check of any person’s criminal history information, including arrest and conviction data, and other information from the Georgia Crime Information Center regarding any adult person who provides care or is in contact with persons under the care of the department without the consent of such person and without fingerprint comparison to the fullest extent permissible by federal and state law.

If the department is participating in the program described in subparagraph (a)(1)(F) of Code Section 35-3-33, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall be authorized to retain fingerprints obtained pursuant to this Code section for such program and the department shall notify the individual whose fingerprints were taken of the parameters of such retention.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-1/HB 214; Ga. L. 2018, p. 507, § 2-7/SB 336.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added subsection (h).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011, “data” was substituted for “date” in the last sentence of subsection (d).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2018).

31-2A-8.
Department as agency of state for receipt and administration of federal and other funds.

The department is designated and empowered as the agency of this state to apply for, receive, and administer grants and donations for health purposes from the federal government and from any of its departments, agencies, and instrumentalities; from appropriations of the state; and from any other sources in conformity with law. The department shall have the authority to prescribe the purposes for which such funds may be used in order to:

Provide, extend, and improve maternal and child health services;

Locate children already disabled or suffering from conditions leading to a disability and provide for such children medical, surgical, corrective, and other services and to provide for facilities for diagnosis, hospitalization, and aftercare;

Advance the prevention and control of cancer and of sexually transmitted, tubercular, and other diseases;

Forestall and correct conditions that, if left to run their course, could be injurious to health;

Conduct programs which lie within the scope and the power of the department relating to industrial hygiene, control of ionizing radiation, occupational health, water quality, water pollution control, and planning and development of water resources;

Administer grants-in-aid to assist in the construction of publicly owned and operated general and special medical facilities;

Conduct programs:

Relating to chronic illness;

Relating to the dental and oral health of the people of this state which are appropriate to the purpose of the department; and

Relating to the physical health of the people of this state which are appropriate to the purpose of the department; and

Develop the health aspects of emergency preparedness and emergency response.

When a plan is required to be approved by any department, agency, or instrumentality of the federal government as condition precedent to the making of grants for health purposes, the department, as agent of this state, is directed to formulate, submit, and secure approval of that plan and thereafter, upon its approval and the receipt of funds payable thereunder, to carry the plan into effect in accordance with its terms, applying thereto the funds so received as well as other applicable amounts from whatever source.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-111, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1069, § 3; Ga. L. 1978, p. 941, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-2-2

; Code 1981, §

31-2-7

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228; Code 1981, §

31-2A-8

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-2/HB 214; Ga. L. 2020, p. 55, § 8/SB 372.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “sexually transmitted” for “venereal” in paragraph (3).

31-2A-9.
Studies and surveys of programs.

The department, from time to time, shall make or cause to be made studies and surveys to determine the quality, scope, and reach of its programs.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-109, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-2-3

; Code 1981, §

31-2-8

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228; Code 1981, §

31-2A-9

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-2/HB 214.

31-2A-10.
Venue of actions against department or board.

Actions at law and in equity against the department, the board, or any of its members predicated upon omissions or acts done in their official capacity or under color thereof shall be brought in the appropriate county; provided, however, that nothing in this Code section shall be construed as waiving the immunity of the state to be sued without its consent.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-118, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-2-5

; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31; Code 1981, §

31-2-10

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228; Code 1981, §

31-2A-10

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-2/HB 214.

31-2A-11.
Standards for sewage management systems.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Chamber system” means a system of chambers with each chamber being a molded polyolefin plastic, arch shaped, hollow structure with an exposed bottom area and solid top and louvered sidewall for infiltration of effluent into adjoining bottom and sidewall soil areas. Chambers may be of different sizes and configurations to obtain desired surface areas.

“Conventional system” means a system traditionally used composed of perforated pipe surrounded by gravel or stone masking for the infiltration of effluent into adjoining bottom and side soil areas.

“On-site sewage management system” means a sewage management system other than a public or community sewage treatment system serving one or more buildings, mobile homes, recreational vehicles, residences, or other facilities designed or used for human occupancy or congregation. Such term shall include, without limitation, conventional and chamber septic tank systems, privies, and experimental and alternative on-site sewage management systems which are designed to be physically incapable of a surface discharge of effluent that may be approved by the department.

“Prior approved system” means only a chamber system or conventional system or component of such system which is designed to be physically incapable of a surface discharge of effluent and which was properly approved pursuant to subparagraph (a)(2)(B) of this Code section, as such Code section became law on April 19, 1994, for use according to manufacturers’ recommendations, prior to April 14, 1997.

“Unsatisfactory service” means documented substandard performance as compared to other approved systems or components.

The department shall have the authority as it deems necessary and proper to adopt state-wide regulations for on-site sewage management systems, including but not limited to experimental and alternative systems. The department is authorized to require that any such on-site sewage management system be examined and approved prior to allowing the use of such system in the state; provided, however, that any prior approved system shall continue to be approved for installation in every county of the state pursuant to the manufacturer’s recommendations, including sizing of no less than 50 percent of trench length of a conventional system designed for equal flows in similar soil conditions. Upon written request of one-half or more of the health districts in the state, the department is authorized to require the reexamination of any such system or component thereof, provided that documentation is submitted indicating unsatisfactory service of such system or component thereof. Before any such examination or reexamination, the department may require the person, persons, or organization manufacturing or marketing the system to reimburse the department or its agent for the reasonable expenses of such examination.

This subsection shall not be construed to prohibit the governing authority of any county or municipality in the state from adopting and enforcing codes at the local level; provided, however, that no county, municipality, or state agency may require any certified septic tank installer or certified septic tank pumper who has executed and deposited a bond as authorized in paragraph (2) of this subsection to give or furnish or execute any code compliance bond or similar bond for the purpose of ensuring that all construction, installation, or modifications are made or completed in compliance with the county or municipal ordinances or building and construction codes.

In order to protect the public from damages arising from any work by a certified septic tank installer or certified septic tank pumper that fails to comply with any state construction codes or with the ordinances or building and construction codes adopted by any county or municipal corporation, any such certified septic tank installer or certified septic tank pumper may execute and deposit with the judge of the probate court in the county of his or her principal place of business a bond in the sum of $10,000.00. Such bond shall be a cash bond of $10,000.00 or executed by a surety authorized and qualified to write surety bonds in the State of Georgia and shall be approved by the local county or municipal health department. Such bond shall be conditioned upon all work done or supervised by such certificate holder complying with the provisions of any state construction codes or any ordinances or building and construction codes of any county or municipal corporation wherein the work is performed. Action on such bond may be brought against the principal and surety thereon in the name of and for the benefit of any person who suffers damages as a consequence of said certificate holder’s work not conforming to the requirements of any ordinances or building and construction codes; provided, however, that the aggregate liability of the surety to all persons so damaged shall in no event exceed the sum of such bond.

In any case where a bond is required under this subsection, the certified septic tank installer or certified septic tank pumper shall file a copy of the bond with the county or municipal health department in the political subdivision wherein the work is being performed.

The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to or affect any bonding requirements involving contracts for public works as provided in Chapter 10 of Title 13.

This Code section does not restrict the work of a plumber licensed by the State Construction Industry Licensing Board to access any on-site sewage management system for the purpose of servicing or repairing any plumbing system or connection to the on-site sewage management system.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 3308, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1777, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 708, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 850, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 292, § 1/HB 724; Code 1981, §

31-2-12

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228; Code 1981, §

31-2A-11

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-2/HB 214.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, “April 14, 1997” was substituted for “the effective date of this Code section” at the end of paragraph (a)(4).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-2A-12.
[Reserved] Rules and regulations governing operation of land disposal sites for septic tank waste from one business.

History.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 927, § 6A; Ga. L. 2007, p. 127, § 5/HB 463; Code 1981, §

31-2-13

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228; Code 1981, §

31-2A-12

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-2/HB 214; Ga. L. 2012, p. 843, § 1B/HB 1102; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 31/HB 737 and was repealed by its own terms effective July 1, 2014; repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 843, § 1B/HB 1102, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 843, § 1B/HB 1102 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2014.

31-2A-13.
Diabetes coordinator; central repository for data related to prevention and treatment of diabetes.

The commissioner is authorized to appoint a diabetes coordinator within the department to coordinate with other state departments and agencies to ensure that all programs that impact the prevention and treatment of diabetes are coordinated, that duplication of efforts is minimized, and that the impact of such programs is maximized in an attempt to reduce the health consequences and complications of diabetes in Georgia. The department shall serve as the central repository for this state’s departments and agencies for data related to the prevention and treatment of diabetes.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228; Code 1981, §

31-2A-13

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-2/HB 214.

Cross references.

Training school employees in caring
for students with diabetes, §

20-2-779

.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).